test/src/morphology/N-myado_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - мяˮ: # Noun 'tent' - partial paradigm /Type 35/
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom: мяˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc: мядмʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen: мядʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat: мятʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc: [мякана, мякна]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl: мякад
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros: мяˮамна
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom: мядˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc: мядо
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen: мядоˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat: мякˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc: [мякаˮна, мякˮна]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl: мякат
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros: мядоˮмана
     
     мяˮ+N+Tra: мяˮӈэ
     мяˮ+N+Car: мяциˮ
     мяˮ+N+Equ: мятремʼ
     мяˮ+N+Equ+Lat: мятревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: мяˮам
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мяˮал  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мята 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: мяˮмиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: мяˮлиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мяˮмаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мяˮлаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мятоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: мяˮам  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мят  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мята 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: мяˮмиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мяˮмаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мятаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мятоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: мяˮан   
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мят 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мята 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: мяˮниʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мяˮнаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мятаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мятоʼ  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: мякан  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: мяканд  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мяканда 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: мяканиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: мякандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: мякандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: мяканаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мякандаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: мякандоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [мяканан, мякнан]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [мякананд, мякнанд]  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [мякананда, мякнанда] 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [мякананиʼ, мякнаниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [мяканандиʼ, мякнандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [мяканандиʼ, мякнандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [мякананаˮ, мякнанаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [мяканандаˮ, мякнандаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [мяканандоʼ, мякнандоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [мякадан, мякдан]  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [мякаданд, мякданд]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [мякаданда, мякданда] 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [мякаданиʼ, мякданиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [мякадандиʼ, мякдандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [мякадандиʼ, мякдандиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [мякаданаˮ, мякданаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [мякадандаˮ, мякдандаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [мякадандоʼ, мякдандоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: мяˮамнан
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: мяˮамнанд  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: мяˮамнанда 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: мяˮамнаниʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: мяˮамнандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: мяˮамнандиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: мяˮамнанаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: мяˮамнандаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: мяˮамнандоʼ
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [мякаюн, мякюн]  
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [мякаюд, мякюд]  
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [мякаюда, мякюда]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [мякаюдаˮ, мякюдаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [мякаюдоʼ, мякюдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [мякаюн, мякюн]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [мякаюд, мякюд]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [мякаюда, мякюда] 
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [мякаюдиʼ, мякюдиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [мякаюдаˮ, мякюдаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [мякаюдоʼ, мякюдоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [мякаюн, мякюн] 
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [мякают, мякют] 
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [мякаюта, мякюта] 
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [мякаюниʼ, мякюниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [мякаютиʼ, мякютиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [мякаютиʼ, мякютиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [мякаюнаˮ, мякюнаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [мякаютаˮ, мякютаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [мякаютоʼ, мякютоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мядон
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мядод   
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мядода  
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: мядониʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мядодиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мядодиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мядонаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мядодаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мядодоʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: мядон
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мядод   
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мядода  
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: мядониʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мядодиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мядодиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мядонаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мядодаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мядодоʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мядоˮн
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мядот   
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мядота  
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: мядоˮниʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: мядотиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: мядотиʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мядоˮнаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мядотаˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мядотоʼ 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: мякаˮн 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: мякат 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [мяката, мякта] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [мякаˮниʼ, мякˮниʼ] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [мякатиʼ, мяктиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [мякатиʼ, мяктиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [мякаˮнаˮ, мякˮнаˮ] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [мякатаˮ, мяктаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [мякатоʼ, мяктоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [мякаˮнан, мякˮнан] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [мякаˮнат, мякˮнат]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [мякаˮната, мякˮната] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [мякаˮнаниʼ, мякˮнаниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [мякаˮнатиʼ, мякˮнатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [мякаˮнатиʼ, мякˮнатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [мякаˮнанаˮ, мякˮнанаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [мякаˮнатаˮ, мякˮнатаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [мякаˮнатоʼ, мякˮнатоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [мякатан, мяктан] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [мякатат, мяктат] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [мякатата, мяктата] 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [мякатаниʼ, мяктаниʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [мякататиʼ, мяктатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [мякататиʼ, мяктатиʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [мякатанаˮ, мяктанаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [мякататаˮ, мяктатаˮ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [мякататоʼ, мяктатоʼ]
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: мядоˮманан  
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: мядоˮманат  
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: мядоˮманата 
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: мядоˮмананиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: мядоˮманатиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: мядоˮманатиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: мядоˮмананаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: мядоˮманатаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: мядоˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative 

     мяˮ+N+Pred+Abs: мят
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мятав, мятув]
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мятар
     мяˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [мятада, мятда]
               
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мятмʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мят  
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мяˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мяˮниʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мятиʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мякʼ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мяˮмаˮ
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мятаˮ  # or ? мяˮлаˮ T919
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: мядˮ     # or ?  мяˮ 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мятамзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мятась 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мяць   
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мяˮнинзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мятинзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мяканзь
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мяˮмаць 
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мятаць  # or ? мяˮлаць
     мяˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: мядаць      # or ? мятёнзь  
